California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) If an independent evaluation has not yet been completed, the department may grant an extension based upon its review of available information. However, an independent evaluation shall be required to be completed within one year prior to the end of the waiver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 663, Sec. 9.   (SB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.87. Reform of Residentially Based Services for Children and Youth  [18987.7. - 18987.72.]

18987.7.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall convene a workgroup of public and private nonprofit stakeholders that shall develop a plan for transforming the current system of group care for foster children or youth, and for children with serious emotional disorders (SED), into a system of residentially based services. The stakeholders may include, but not be limited to, representatives of the department, the State Department of Education, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation; county child welfare, probation, mental health, and alcohol and drug programs; local education authorities; current and former foster youth, parents of foster children or youth, and children or youth with SED; private nonprofit agencies operating
 group homes; children’s advocates; and other interested parties.

(b) The plan developed pursuant to this chapter shall utilize the reports delivered to the Legislature pursuant to Section 75 of Chapter 311 of the Statutes of 1998 by the Steering Committee for the Reexamination of the Role of Group Care in a Family-Based System of Care in June 2001 and August 2002, and the “Framework for a New System for Residentially-Based Services in California” published in March 2006.

(c) In the development, implementation, and subsequent revisions of the plan developed pursuant to subdivision (a), the knowledge and experience gained by counties and private nonprofit agencies through the operation of their residentially based services programs created under voluntary agreements made pursuant to Section 18987.72, including, but not limited to, the results of evaluations prepared pursuant to
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 18987.72 shall be utilized.

(d) The workgroup described in subdivision (a) shall be the workgroup described in Section 11461.2. The responsibilities described in subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be assumed by the workgroup and the recommendations shall be submitted as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 11461.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 108.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

18987.71.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) (1) “Residentially based services” means behavioral or therapeutic interventions delivered in nondetention group care settings in which multiple children or youth live in the same housing unit and receive care and supervision from paid staff. Residentially based services are most effectively used as intensive, short-term interventions when children have unmet needs that create conditions that render them or those around them unsafe, or that prevent the effective delivery of needed services and supports provided in the children’s own homes or in other family settings, such as with a relative, guardian, foster family, or adoptive family.

(2) “Residentially based services” shall include the following interventions and services:

(A) Environmental interventions that establish a safe, stable, and structured living situation in which children or youth can receive the comfort, attention, structure, and guidance needed to help them reduce the intensity of conditions that led to their placement in the program, so that their caregivers can identify and address the factors creating those conditions.

(B) Intensive treatment interventions that facilitate the rapid movement of children or youth toward connection or reconnection with appropriate and natural home, school, and community ecologies, by helping them and their families find ways to mitigate the conditions that led to their placement in the program with positive and productive alternatives.

(C) Parallel, predischarge, community-based interventions that help family members and other people in the social ecologies that children and youth will be joining or rejoining, to prepare for connection or reconnection. These preparations should be initiated upon placement and proceed apace with the environmental interventions being provided within the residential setting.

(D) Followup postdischarge support and services, consistent with the child’s case plan, provided as needed after children or youth have exited the residential component and returned to their own family or to another family living situation, in order to ensure the stability and success of the connection or reconnection with home, school, and community.

(b) “County” means a county that enters into a voluntary agreement with a private nonprofit agency to test alternative program designs and funding models pursuant to this chapter, and may include a consortia or consortium of counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 466, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

18987.72.

(a) In order to obtain knowledge and experience with which to inform the process of developing and implementing the plan for residentially based services, required by Section 18987.7, the department shall encourage counties and private nonprofit agencies to develop voluntary agreements to test alternative program design and funding models for transforming existing group home programs into residentially based services programs in order to meet the diverse needs of children or youth and families in the child welfare, juvenile justice, and mental health systems.

(b) (1) With the approval of the department, any counties participating in the federal Title IV-E
 waiver capped allocation demonstration project pursuant to Section 18260, at their option, and two other counties may enter into and implement voluntary agreements with private nonprofit agencies to transform all or part of an existing group home program into a residentially based services program.

(2) If one or more counties participating in the federal Title IV-E waiver capped allocation demonstration project opts not to enter into a voluntary agreement pursuant to this chapter, the department may select one or more nonwaiver counties. The department may approve up to four counties to participate in the voluntary agreements pursuant to this section.

(3) The department shall select participating counties, based on letters of interest submitted to the department from counties,
 in consultation with the California Alliance of Child and Family Services and the County Welfare Directors Association.

(c) Voluntary agreements by counties and nonprofit agencies shall satisfy all of the following requirements:

(1) Incorporate and address all of the components and elements for residentially based services described in the “Framework for a New System for Residentially-Based Services in California.”

(2) Reflect active collaboration among the private nonprofit agency that will operate the residentially based services program and county departments of social services, mental health, or juvenile justice, alcohol and drug programs, county offices of education, or other public entities, as appropriate, to
 ensure that children, youth, and families receive the services and support necessary to meet their needs.

(3) Provide for an annual evaluation report, to be prepared jointly by the county and the private nonprofit agency. The evaluation report shall include analyses of the outcomes for children and youth, including achievement of permanency, average lengths of stay, and rates of entry and reentry into group care. The evaluation report shall also include analyses of the involvement of children or youth and their families, client satisfaction, the use of the program by the county, the operation of the program by the private nonprofit agency, payments made to the private nonprofit agency by the county, actual costs incurred by the nonprofit agency for the operation of the program, and the impact of the program on state and county AFDC-FC
 program costs. The county shall send a copy of each annual evaluation report to the director, and the director shall make these reports available to the Legislature upon request.

(4) Permit amendments, modifications, and extensions of the agreement to be made, with the mutual consent of both parties and with approval of the department, based on the evaluations described in paragraph (3), and on the experience and information acquired from the implementation and the ongoing operation of the program.

(5) Be consistent with the county’s system improvement plan developed pursuant to the California Child Welfare Outcomes and Accountability System.

(d) (1) Upon a county’s request, the director may waive
 child welfare regulations regarding the role of counties in conjunction with private nonprofit agencies operating residentially based services programs to enhance the development and implementation of case plans and the delivery of services in order to enable a county and a private nonprofit agency to implement an agreement described in subdivision (b). Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede the requirements set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 16501.

(2) Notwithstanding Sections 11460 and 11462, or any other law or regulation governing payments under the AFDC-FC program, upon the request of one or more counties, and in accordance with the voluntary agreements as described in subdivision (b), the director may also approve the use of up to a total of five alternative funding models for determining the method and
 level of payments that will be made under the AFDC-FC program to private nonprofit agencies operating residentially based services programs in lieu of using the rate classification levels and schedule of standard rates provided for in Section 11462. These alternative funding models may include, but shall not be limited to, the use of cost reimbursement, case rates, per diem or monthly rates, or a combination thereof. An alternative funding model shall do all of the following:

(A) Support the values and goals for residentially based services, including active child and family involvement, permanence, collaborative decisionmaking, and outcome measurement.

(B) Ensure that quality care and effective services are delivered to appropriate children or youth at a reasonable cost to the
 public.

(C) Ensure that payment levels are sufficient to permit the private nonprofit agencies operating residentially based services programs to provide care and supervision, social work activities, parallel predischarge community-based interventions for families, and followup postdischarge support and services for children and their families, including the cost of hiring and retaining qualified staff.

(D) Facilitate compliance with state requirements and the attainment of federal and state performance objectives.

(E) Control overall program costs by providing incentives for the private nonprofit agencies to use the most cost-effective approaches for achieving positive outcomes for the children or youth and their
 families.

(F) Facilitate the ability of the private nonprofit agencies to access other available public sources of funding and services to meet the needs of the children or youth placed in their residentially based services programs, and the needs of their families.

(G) Enable the combination of various funding streams necessary to meet the full range of services needed by foster children or youth in residentially based services programs, with particular reference to funding for mental health treatment services through the Medi-Cal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment program.

(H) Maximize federal financial participation, and mitigate the loss of federal funds, while ensuring the effective delivery
 of services to children or youth and families, and the achievement of positive outcomes.

(I) Provide for effective administrative oversight and enforcement mechanisms in order to ensure programmatic and fiscal accountability.

(3) A waiver granted by the director pursuant to paragraph (1), or an approval of an alternative funding model pursuant to paragraph (2), shall be applicable only to the development, implementation, and ongoing operation of a residentially based services program and related county activities provided under the terms of the agreement and for the duration of the agreement, and shall be granted only when all of the following apply:

(A) The agreement promises to offer a worthwhile test related to
 the development, implementation, and ongoing operation of a residentially based services program as described in this chapter.

(B) Existing regulatory provisions or the existing AFDC-FC payment requirements, or both, impose barriers for the effective, efficient, and timely implementation of the agreement.

(C) The requesting county proposes to monitor the agreement for compliance with the terms of the waiver or the alternative funding model, or both.

(D) Notwithstanding any change to payments made to group homes under Section 11462, the department may pay higher AFDC-FC payments for children and youth who are enrolled in a residentially based services program, to be offset by cost efficiencies achieved through shorter
 lengths of stay in foster care, or a reduction of reentries into foster care, as a result of providing predischarge support and postdischarge services to the children or youth and their families. Any upfront costs for this project shall be offset by other program savings identified by the department, to ensure that there are no net General Fund costs in each fiscal year.

(e) In addition to the requirements set forth in subdivision (c), the voluntary agreements shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide that, to the extent that some of the care, services, and other activities associated with a residentially based services program operated under an agreement described in subdivision (b) are not eligible for federal financial participation as foster care maintenance payments
 under Part E (commencing with Section 470) of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.), but may be eligible for federal financial participation as administration or training, or may be eligible for federal financial participation under other programs, including, but not limited to, Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.), the appropriate state departments shall take measures to obtain that federal funding.

(2) Provide that, prior to approving any waiver or alternative funding model pursuant to subdivision (d), the director shall make a determination that the design of the residentially based services program to be operated under the agreement described in subdivision (b) would ensure the health and safety of children or youth to be served.

(f) Agreements entered into pursuant to this section shall terminate on or before January 1, 2017, or may be extended until January 1, 2019, upon approval by the department, on a case-by-case basis, unless a later enacted statute extends or removes this limitation.

(g) The department shall report during the legislative budget hearings on the status of any county agreements entered into pursuant to subdivision (b), and on the development of statewide residentially based services programs. This report shall be submitted with the recommendations made pursuant to Section 11461.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 773, Sec. 120.   (AB 403)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.9. Regulatory Flexibility for Adult Social Services [18988. - 18988.10.]

18988.

(a) In order to ensure maximum flexibility in providing adult social services programs administered by the State Department of Social Services, including, but not limited to, In-Home Supportive Services and adult protective services, and that are impacted by the realignment of state and county services by the act that added this chapter, a county may submit to the Director of Social Services a request to waive existing state regulations which hinder the coordination and provision of services.

(b) Any county may appeal any negative decision regarding a requested waiver of state regulations submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) that is made by the Director of Social Services to the
 Secretary of California Health and Human Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 100.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18988.05.

Any request under this chapter shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following:

(a) The regulation or regulations for which the county requests a waiver. 

(b) A statement as to why the identified regulation or regulations should be waived. 

(c) A statement as to why the identified regulation or regulations inhibit the efficient administration of the program. 

(d) A comparison of the following: 

(1) The services and the number of persons to be served under the requested waiver. 

(2) The services and the number of persons to be served without the requested waiver. 

(e) Projected costs or savings due to the requested waiver. 

(f) Any impact on state and federal funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 91, Sec. 37.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

18988.10.

When approving a county request for a waiver pursuant to this chapter, the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency shall ensure all of the following:

(a) Services and eligible persons served under the affected program are maintained. 

(b) There is no increase in costs to the state or to clients.

(c) There is no loss of federal financial participation. 

(d) The Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency shall notify the appropriate policy committees and fiscal committees of the Legislature no later than 30 days before any waiver or waivers granted pursuant to this chapter take effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 91, Sec. 37.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.95. San Mateo County Consolidated Human Services Agency [18989. - 18989.2.]

18989.

(a) Any agency established by San Mateo County for purposes of providing any combination of human services may apply for a waiver of existing state regulations pertaining to single agency operations and auditing and accounting requirements that hinder the coordination of human services provided by that agency.

(b) When the services to be coordinated are any combination of those listed in Section 18986.11, the process for requesting and granting a waiver shall conform to the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 18986.20) of Chapter 12.8.

(c) When the services to be coordinated include services that are not listed in Section 18986.11, the process for requesting and granting a waiver shall conform to the requirements of Sections 18989.1 and 18989.2.

(d) Any request for a waiver of confidentiality requirements to permit a sharing of information within the county agency shall conform to the requirements of Section 18986.45 and shall be only for purposes of consolidated case management.

(e) In no event shall the waiver request violate Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 17600) of Part 5.5.

(f) In no event shall a waiver be granted for modifications to regulations governing qualifications for professionals employed in human service programs that are consolidated by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1155, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

18989.1.

Any request under this chapter shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following:

(a) The regulation or regulations for which the county requests a waiver.

(b) A statement as to why the identified regulation or regulations should be waived.

(c) A statement as to why the identified regulation or regulations inhibit the efficient administration of the program.

(d) A comparison of the following:

(1) The services and the number of persons to be served under the requested waiver.

(2) The services and the number of persons to be served without the requested waiver.

(e) Projected costs or savings due to the requested waiver.

(f) Any impact on state and federal funding.

(g) A statement that the collective bargaining agent or agents for any affected employees have been provided with notice of the waiver and the information included in the waiver.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1155, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

18989.2.

The request for waiver shall be submitted to the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency. When approving a request for a waiver pursuant to this chapter, the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency shall ensure all of the following:

(a) Services and eligible persons served under the affected program or programs are maintained.

(b) There is no increase in costs to the state or to clients.

(c) There is no loss of federal financial participation.

(d) The waiver does not revise the implementation of the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 17600) of Part 5.5 regarding the realignment of health, mental health, and social services programs.

(e) The Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature no later than 30 days before any waiver or waivers pursuant to this chapter take effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1155, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.96. Placer County Integrated Health and Human Services Program [18990. - 18990.]

18990.

(a) Placer County, with the assistance of the appropriate state departments, within the existing resources of those departments, shall implement a program upon approval of that county, for the funding and delivery of services and benefits through an integrated and comprehensive county health and human services system.

(b) The Placer County program shall, in providing services through an integrated system to families and individuals, among other things, do all of the following:

(1) Implement and evaluate a system of universal intake for those seeking services.

(2) Implement and evaluate a system whereby a family or individual eligible for
 more than one service may be provided those services by as few as a single county employee, through an integrated, coordinated service plan.

(3) Implement and evaluate a system of administration that centralizes the management and support of client services.

(4) Implement and evaluate a system of reporting and accountability that provides for the combined provision of services as provided for in paragraph (2), without the loss of state or federal funds provided under current law.

(c) The integrated system may include, but need not be limited to, any or all of the following:

(1) Adoption services.

(2) Child abuse prevention services.

(3) Child welfare services.

(4) Delinquency prevention services.

(5) Drug and alcohol services.

(6) Mental health services.

(7) Eligibility determination.

(8) Employment and training services.

(9) Foster care services.

(10) Health services.

(11) Public health services.

(12) Housing services.

(13) Medically
 indigent program services.

(14) All other appropriately identified and targeted services, except for dental care.

(d) Programs or services shall be included in the program only to the extent that federal funding to either the state or the county will not be reduced as a result of the inclusion of the services in the program. This program shall not generate any increased expenditures from the General Fund.

(e) The county and the appropriate state departments shall jointly seek federal approval of the program, as may be needed to ensure its funding and allow for the integrated provision of services.

(f) This chapter does not authorize Placer County to discontinue meeting its obligations under current law to provide services or to reduce its accountability
 for the provision of these services.

(g) This chapter does not authorize Placer County to reduce its eligibility under current law for state funding for the services included in the program.

(h) Placer County shall utilize any and all state general and county funds that it is legally allocated or entitled to receive. Through the creation of integrated health and social services structures, the county shall maximize federal matching funds.

(i) The appropriate state departments that are assisting and cooperating in the implementation of the program authorized by this chapter shall have the authority to waive regulations regarding the method of providing services and the method of reporting and accountability, as may be required to meet the goals set forth in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18986.60 by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 295.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.991. County Integrated Health and Human Services Program [18991. - 18991.4.]

18991.

(a) Humboldt County, Mendocino County, Alameda County, and any additional county or counties, as determined by the Secretary of California Health and Human Services, with the assistance and participation of the appropriate state departments, within the existing resources of those departments, may implement a program, upon approval of the county board of supervisors for the funding and delivery of services and benefits through an integrated and comprehensive county health and human services system.

(b) In providing services through an integrated system to families and individuals, the program may, among other things, do all of the following:

(1) Implement and
 evaluate a system of universal intake for those seeking services.

(2) Implement and evaluate a system whereby a family or individual eligible for more than one service may be provided those services through an integrated, coordinated service plan.

(3) Implement and evaluate a system of administration that integrates and coordinates the management and support of client services.

(4) Implement and evaluate a system of reporting and accountability that provides for the combined provision of services as provided for in paragraph (2), without the loss of state or federal funds provided under current law.

(5) In consultation with the appropriate state departments, as designated by the Secretary of Health and Human Services, any participating county may
 develop specific goals in addition to those specified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, to achieve an integrated and comprehensive county health and human services system.

(c) The integrated system may include any or all of the following:

(1) Adoption services.

(2) Child abuse prevention services.

(3) Child welfare services.

(4) Delinquency prevention services.

(5) Drug and alcohol services.

(6) Mental health services.

(7) Eligibility determination.

(8) Employment and training services.

(9) Foster care services.

(10) Health services.

(11) Public health services.

(12) Housing services.

(13) Medically indigent program services.

(d) (1) Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code applies to the programs or services providing integrated services.

(2) Before a program obtains an individual’s medical information, including mental health and drug treatment records, his or her informed authorization shall be
 obtained, or the informed authorization of his or her custodial parent, or his or her guardian shall be obtained if the individual is a minor, unless the minor is authorized to give consent.

(3) Medical information shall not be disclosed to any individual who is not authorized to have that information pursuant to the authorization provided in paragraph (2).

(4) Medical information shall not be disclosed for any purpose that is not authorized by the authorization in paragraph (2).

(5) The sharing of information permitted under paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) shall be governed by memoranda of understanding among the agencies represented on the team. These memoranda shall specify the types of information that may be shared without a signed release form, and the process to be used to ensure that current confidentiality
 requirements, as described in subdivision (d), are met.

(6) A client shall have access to his or her medical information and shall have the right to correct any inaccurate information contained in the medical information.

(e) Programs or services shall be included in the program only to the extent that federal funding to either the state or the county will not be reduced as a result of the inclusion of the services in the project. This program shall not generate any increased expenditures from the General Fund.

(f) Each participating county and the appropriate state departments shall jointly seek federal approval of the program, as may be needed to ensure its funding and allow for the integrated provision of services.

(g) This chapter does not authorize
 each participating county to discontinue meeting its obligations under current law to provide services or to reduce its accountability for the provision of these services.

(h) This chapter does not authorize a participating county to reduce the county’s eligibility under current law for state funding for the services included in the program.

(i) A participating county shall utilize any and all state general and county funds that it is legally allocated or entitled to receive. Through the creation of integrated health and social services structures, the county shall maximize federal matching funds.

(j) The Secretary of Health and Human Services shall designate a lead department to coordinate the state’s participation in the county’s program.

(k) The
 appropriate state departments, as designated by the Secretary of Health and Human Services, that are assisting, participating, and cooperating in the implementation of the program authorized by this chapter shall have the authority to waive regulations regarding the method of providing services and the method of reporting and accountability, as may be required to meet the goals set forth in subdivision (b). However, the departments shall not waive regulations pertaining to privacy and confidentiality of records, civil service merit systems, or collective bargaining. The departments shall not waive regulations if the waiver results in a diminished amount or level of services or benefits to eligible recipients as compared to the benefits and services that would have been provided to recipients absent the waiver.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18986.86 by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 296.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

18991.2.

(a) A participating county shall, in consultation with the appropriate state departments, as designated by the Secretary of Health and Human Services, develop outcomes and performance measures specific to the project before the implementation of the pilot program. Implementation of a pilot program pursuant to this chapter shall occur no later than January 1, 2009.

(b) A participating county shall evaluate its program with the participation of the appropriate state departments, as designated by the Secretary of Health and Human Services, and prepare interim and final evaluations and submit them to the Governor or the Governor’s designee and the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The interim report shall be
 submitted not later than six months following the third year of the implementation of the program. The final report shall be submitted not later than July 1, 2008.

(c) Each participating county shall provide for the evaluation of the program.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18986.87 by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 297.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

18991.4.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding the dates provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 18991.2, the County of San Diego and any other county may, upon approval of
 their respective county board of supervisors, each operate an integrated and comprehensive county health and human services system.

(2) A system described in paragraph (1) shall comply with the requirements of this section and is subject to the approval of the California Health and Human Services Agency. The California Health and Human Services Agency shall grant approval for a county if the county furnishes a certified copy of a current ordinance or resolution authorizing an integrated and comprehensive health and human services system in that county.

(b) In providing services through an integrated system to families and individuals, the system may, among other things, do both of the following:

(1) Maintain and evaluate a system of administration that integrates and coordinates the management and support of client services.

(2) Maintain a system of reporting and accountability that provides for the combined provision of services without the loss of state or federal funds provided under current law.

(c) The integrated and comprehensive county health and human services system may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Adoption services.

(2) Child abuse prevention services.

(3) Child welfare services.

(4) Delinquency prevention services.

(5) Drug and alcohol services.

(6) Mental health services.

(7) Eligibility determination.

(8) Employment and training services.

(9) Foster care services.

(10) Health services.

(11) Public health services.

(12) Housing services.

(13) Medically indigent program services.

(14) Veterans’ services.

(15) Aging services.

(16) Any other related program as designated by the board of supervisors.

(d) The county shall comply with all applicable state and federal privacy laws that govern medical and social service information, including, but not limited to, the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code), the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA), and Sections 827, 5328, and 10850.

(e) Programs or services shall be included in the system only to the extent that federal funding to either the state or the county will
 not be reduced as a result of the inclusion of the services in the project.

(f) This section does not authorize the county to discontinue meeting its obligations under current law to provide services or to reduce its accountability for the provision of these services.

(g) The county shall utilize any and all state general funds and county funds that it is legally allocated or entitled to receive. Through the creation of integrated health and social services structures, the county shall maximize federal matching funds. This integration shall not result in increased expenditures from the State General Fund.

(h) The appropriate state departments, as designated by the Secretary of Health and Human Services, that are assisting,
 participating, and cooperating in the program authorized by this section shall have the authority to waive regulations, with the concurrence of the county, regarding the method of providing services and the method of reporting and accountability, as may be required to meet the goals set forth in subdivision (b). However, the departments shall not waive regulations pertaining to privacy and confidentiality of records, civil service merit systems, or collective bargaining. The departments shall not waive regulations if the waiver results in a diminished amount or level of services or benefits to eligible recipients as compared to the benefits and services that would have been provided to recipients absent the waiver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 325, Sec. 1.   (AB 2821)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Community Challenge Grant Program [18993. - 18993.9.]

18993.

There is hereby created the Community Challenge Grant Program in the State Department of Health Services to provide community challenge grants to reduce the number of teenage and unwed pregnancies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 197, Sec. 51.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18993.1.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) One in three children in California is born out of wedlock.

(b) As many as 70,000 children were born to teenagers in each of at least the last two years and nearly 25 percent of these were born to teenage mothers who have previously had children.

(c) Children who grow up without fathers are five times more likely to be poor, twice as likely to drop out of school, and much more likely to end up in foster care or juvenile justice facilities.

(d) Girls raised in single-parent families are three times more likely to become unwed teenage mothers than those girls raised in two-parent families.

(e) Boys without a father in the home are more likely to become incarcerated, unemployed, or uninvolved with their own children when they become fathers.

(f) The consequences of teenage pregnancy and fatherlessness are significant and far-reaching.

(g) Teenage and unwed pregnancy are problems that affect community health and success.

(h) Government can best solve the problems of teenage and unwed pregnancies in partnership with local communities, parents, and families.

(i) Communities should decide what prevention strategies will work and be acceptable.

(j) Parents and families should be included in the teenage pregnancy prevention strategies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 197, Sec. 51.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18993.2.

(a) The State Department of Health Services shall administer grants for purposes of this chapter that shall be awarded pursuant to a request for application process.

(b) Grants shall be awarded to existing and new community-based nonprofit organizations and county and local governments for purposes of implementing locally developed prevention and intervention strategies designed to do the following:

(1) Reduce the number of teenage and unwed pregnancies.

(2) Reduce the number of children growing up in homes without fathers as a result of these pregnancies.

(3) Promote responsible parenting and the involvement of the father in the economic, social, and emotional support of his children.

(c) Grant funding shall not be used for clinical services and shall target, but not be limited to, the following populations:

(1) Presexual adolescents.

(2) Sexually active adolescents.

(3) Pregnant and parenting adolescents.

(4) Parents and families.

(5) Adults at risk for unwed motherhood or absentee fatherhood.

(d) The department shall provide outreach and training to potential grantees to increase the number of agencies and groups that may be able to successfully compete for the grants.

(e) The department shall issue periodic reports that describe the projects that have been awarded grants pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 197, Sec. 51.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18993.3.
